Hawaii statutes.
[§468M-2.5] Activity desk principal;
responsibilities. (a) Each activity desk shall designate a principal who
shall have direct management and supervision of the activity desk, including
but not limited to compliance with sections 468M-9 and 468M-10.

(b) The activity desk shall designate the
activity desk principal with each registration and registration renewal and
shall provide notification in writing to the department within ten days after
any change in the designation of the activity desk principal.

(c) The activity desk shall disclose the name
and contact information of the activity desk principal to a client trust
account beneficiary upon request.

(d) For purposes of this section,
"principal" means a corporate officer or director, a partner in a
partnership, a sole proprietor, or an individual with an ownership interest in
the activity desk who shall be a signatory of any client trust account of the
activity desk. [L 2015, c 61, §1]

Note

Current registrants: Disclosure of an activity desk
principal commences with the registration renewal required for registrations
that expire on December 31, 2017. L 2015, c 61, §4.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next